Utah statutes.
11-13-302.   Payment of fee in lieu of ad valorem property tax by certain
energy suppliers -- Method of calculating -- Collection -- Extent of tax lien.
(1) (a)  Each project entity created under this chapter that owns a project
and that sells any capacity, service, or other benefit from it to an energy
supplier or suppliers whose tangible property is not exempted by Utah
Constitution Article XIII, Section 3, from the payment of ad valorem property
tax, shall pay an annual fee in lieu of ad valorem property tax as provided in
this section to each taxing jurisdiction within which the project or any part
of it is located.
(b)  For purposes of this section, "annual fee" means the annual fee described
in Subsection (1)(a) that is in lieu of ad valorem property tax.
(c)  The requirement to pay an annual fee shall commence:
(i)  with respect to each taxing jurisdiction that is a candidate receiving
the benefit of impact alleviation payments under contracts or determination
orders provided for in Sections 11-13-305 and 11-13-306, with the fiscal year
of the candidate following the fiscal year of the candidate in which the date
of commercial operation of the last generating unit, other than any generating
unit providing additional project capacity, of the project occurs, or, in the
case of any facilities providing additional project capacity, with the fiscal
year of the candidate following the fiscal year of the candidate in which the
date of commercial operation of the generating unit providing the additional
project capacity occurs; and
(ii)  with respect to any taxing jurisdiction other than a taxing jurisdiction
described in Subsection (1)(c)(i), with the fiscal year of the taxing
jurisdiction in which construction of the project commences, or, in the case
of facilities providing additional project capacity, with the fiscal year of
the taxing jurisdiction in which construction of those facilities commences.
(d)  The requirement to pay an annual fee shall continue for the period of the
useful life of the project or facilities.
(2) (a)  The annual fees due a school district shall be as provided in
Subsection (2)(b) because the ad valorem property tax imposed by a school
district and authorized by the Legislature under Section 53A-17a-135
represents both:
(i)  a levy mandated by the state for the state minimum school program under
Section 53A-17a-135; and
(ii)  local levies for capital outlay, maintenance, transportation, and other
purposes under Sections 11-2-7, 53A-16-107, 53A-16-110, 53A-17a-126, 53A-
17a-127, 53A-17a-133, 53A-17a-134, 53A-17a-143, and 53A-17a-145.
(b)  The annual fees due a school district shall be as follows:
(i)  the project entity shall pay to the school district an annual fee for the
state minimum school program at the rate imposed by the school district and
authorized by the Legislature under Subsection 53A-17a-135(1); and
(ii)  for all other local property tax levies authorized to be imposed by a
school district, the project entity shall pay to the school district either:
(A)  an annual fee; or
(B)  impact alleviation payments under contracts or determination orders
provided for in Sections 11-13-305 and 11-13-306.
(3) (a)  An annual fee due a taxing jurisdiction for a particular year shall
be calculated by multiplying the tax rate or rates of the jurisdiction for
that year by the product obtained by multiplying the fee base or value
determined in accordance with Subsection (4) for that year of the portion of
the project located within the jurisdiction by the percentage of the project
which is used to produce the capacity, service, or other benefit sold to the
energy supplier or suppliers.
(b)  As used in this section, "tax rate," when applied in respect to a school
district, includes any assessment to be made by the school district under
Subsection (2) or Section 63M-5-302.
(c)  There is to be credited against the annual fee due a taxing jurisdiction
for each year, an amount equal to the debt service, if any, payable in that
year by the project entity on bonds, the proceeds of which were used to
provide public facilities and services for impact alleviation in the taxing
jurisdiction in accordance with Sections 11-13-305 and 11-13-306.
(d)  The tax rate for the taxing jurisdiction for that year shall be computed
so as to:
(i)  take into account the fee base or value of the percentage of the project
located within the taxing jurisdiction determined in accordance with
Subsection (4) used to produce the capacity, service, or other benefit sold to
the supplier or suppliers; and
(ii)  reflect any credit to be given in that year.
(4) (a)  Except as otherwise provided in this section, the annual fees
required by this section shall be paid, collected, and distributed to the
taxing jurisdiction as if:
(i)  the annual fees were ad valorem property taxes; and
(ii)  the project were assessed at the same rate and upon the same measure of
value as taxable property in the state.
(b) (i)  Notwithstanding Subsection (4)(a), for purposes of an annual fee
required by this section, the fee base of a project may be determined in
accordance with an agreement among:
(A)  the project entity; and
(B)  any county that:
(I)  is due an annual fee from the project entity; and
(II)  agrees to have the fee base of the project determined in accordance with
the agreement described in this Subsection (4).
(ii)  The agreement described in Subsection (4)(b)(i):
(A)  shall specify each year for which the fee base determined by the
agreement shall be used for purposes of an annual fee; and
(B)  may not modify any provision of this chapter except the method by which
the fee base of a project is determined for purposes of an annual fee.
(iii)  For purposes of an annual fee imposed by a taxing jurisdiction within a
county described in Subsection (4)(b)(i)(B), the fee base determined by the
agreement described in Subsection (4)(b)(i) shall be used for purposes of an
annual fee imposed by that taxing jurisdiction.
(iv) (A)  If there is not agreement as to the fee base of a portion of a
project for any year, for purposes of an annual fee, the State Tax Commission
shall determine the value of that portion of the project for which there is
not an agreement:
(I)  for that year; and
(II)  using the same measure of value as is used for taxable property in the
state.
(B)  The valuation required by Subsection (4)(b)(iv)(A) shall be made by the
State Tax Commission in accordance with rules made by the State Tax
Commission.
(c)  Payments of the annual fees shall be made from:
(i)  the proceeds of bonds issued for the project; and
(ii)  revenues derived by the project entity from the project.
(d) (i)  The contracts of the project entity with the purchasers of the
capacity, service, or other benefits of the project whose tangible property is
not exempted by Utah Constitution Article XIII, Section 3, from the payment of
ad valorem property tax shall require each purchaser, whether or not located
in the state, to pay, to the extent not otherwise provided for, its share,
determined in accordance with the terms of the contract, of these fees.
(ii)  It is the responsibility of the project entity to enforce the
obligations of the purchasers.
(5) (a)  The responsibility of the project entity to make payment of the
annual fees is limited to the extent that there is legally available to the
project entity, from bond proceeds or revenues, monies to make these payments,
and the obligation to make payments of the annual fees is not otherwise a
general obligation or liability of the project entity.
(b)  No tax lien may attach upon any property or money of the project entity
by virtue of any failure to pay all or any part of an annual fee.
(c)  The project entity or any purchaser may contest the validity of an annual
fee to the same extent as if the payment was a payment of the ad valorem
property tax itself.
(d)  The payments of an annual fee shall be reduced to the extent that any
contest is successful.
(6) (a)  The annual fee described in Subsection (1):
(i)  shall be paid by a public agency that:
(A)  is not a project entity; and
(B)  owns an interest in a facility providing additional project capacity if
the interest is otherwise exempt from taxation pursuant to Utah Constitution,
Article XIII, Section 3; and
(ii)  for a public agency described in Subsection (6)(a)(i), shall be
calculated in accordance with Subsection (6)(b).
(b)  The annual fee required under Subsection (6)(a) shall be an amount equal
to the tax rate or rates of the applicable taxing jurisdiction multiplied by
the product of the following:
(i)  the fee base or value of the facility providing additional project
capacity located within the jurisdiction;
(ii)  the percentage of the ownership interest of the public agency in the
facility; and
(iii)  the portion, expressed as a percentage, of the public agency's
ownership interest that is attributable to the capacity, service, or other
benefit from the facility that is sold by the public agency to an energy
supplier or suppliers whose tangible property is not exempted by Utah
Constitution, Article XIII, Section 3, from the payment of ad valorem property
tax.
(c)  A public agency paying the annual fee pursuant to Subsection (6)(a) shall
have the obligations, credits, rights, and protections set forth in
Subsections (1) through (5) with respect to its ownership interest as though
it were a project entity.
